Washington statutes.
RCW 19.285.010

Intent.

This chapter concerns requirements for new energy resources. This chapter requires large utilities to obtain fifteen percent of their electricity from new renewable resources such as solar and wind by 2020 and undertake cost-effective energy conservation.

[ 2007 c 1 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 937, approved November 7, 2006).]